Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,124
Bequests, devises, and gifts.

Any bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription, or conveyance that is made to a constituent corporation and that takes effect or remains payable after the merger, inures to the surviving corporation unless the will or other instrument otherwise specifically provides.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 124.